apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
<pardef n="गर__v">
<e>       <p><l>्छ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नुहुन्छ</l>                           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नुहुन्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्इछ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:इछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ई</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ई"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नेछ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्नेछन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छिन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्छन्</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ला</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्लान्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:लान्"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

-->

    <!-- Proper names -->

<pardef n="राम__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="सीता__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

<pardef n="घर__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="एसियन__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>       
</pardef>

<pardef n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="डोक/ो__n">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="केट/ा__n">
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ाहरु</l>                                  <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="केटी__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="भाइ__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरु</l>                                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="बहिनी__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

<pardef n="य/ो__prn">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ी</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्तो</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्ती</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्ता</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="त्य/ो__prn">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ी</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्तो</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्ती</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>स्ता</l>                               <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ऊ__prn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r>ऊ<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="उहाँ__prn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r>हाँ<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>हरू</l>                                <r>हाँ<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ई__prn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r>ई<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r>नी<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="क/ो__prn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>्ुन</l>                                <r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="त__prn">
<e>       <p><l>पाईँ</l>                               <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>िमी</l>                                <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="हामी__prn">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="एउटा__det">
	<e> <p><l></l> <r><s n="det"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p> </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="उनको__det">
	<e><p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="धेरै__preadv">
	<e><p><l></l> <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="सायद__adv">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<e lm="एउटा"><i>एउटा</i><par n="एउटा__det"/></e>
<e lm="मेरो"><i>मेरो</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="हाम्रो"><i>हाम्रो</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="तिम्रो"><i>तिम्रो</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="उसको"><i>उसको</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="उनको"><i>उनको</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="उनीहरुको"><i>उनीहरुको</i><par n="उनको__det"/></e>
<e lm="बुटवल"><i>बुटवल</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="भैरहवा"><i>भैरहवा</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="महेन्द्रनगर"><i>महेन्द्रनगर</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="दमक"><i>दमक</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="दिल्ली"><i>दिल्ली</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="मेची"><i>मेची</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सगरमाथा"><i>सगरमाथा</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="बागमती"><i>बागमती</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="गण्डकी"><i>गण्डकी</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="धवलागिरी"><i>धवलागिरी</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सेती"><i>सेती</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="बांग्लादेश"><i>बांग्लादेश</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अफ्गानिस्तान"><i>अफ्गानिस्तान</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="चीन"><i>चीन</i><par n="काठ्माण्डौँ__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अलबानियन"><i>अलबानियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अरब"><i>अरब</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अर्जेनटिनियन"><i>अर्जेनटिनियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="एसियन"><i>एसियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="कातलान"><i>कातलान</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="क्याथोलिक"><i>क्याथोलिक</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="क्रिस्चियन"><i>क्रिस्चियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="युरोपियन"><i>युरोपियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="इन्डियन"><i>इन्डियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="कोरियन"><i>कोरियन</i><par n="एसियन__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अभयवचन"><i>अभयवचन</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिभावक"><i>अभिभावक</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिघात"><i>अभिघात</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिज्ञानपत्र"><i>अभिज्ञानपत्र</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिरक्षण"><i>अभिरक्षण</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="अभिशाप"><i>अभिशाप</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="हात्ती"><i>हात्ती</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="आइमाई"><i>आइमाई</i><par n="केटी__n"/></e>
<e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="बोतल"><i>बोतल</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="कलम"><i>कलम</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="कोठा"><i>कोठ</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="मुसो"><i>मुस</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="केटा"><i>केट</i><par n="केट/ा__n"/></e>
<e lm="केटी"><i>केटी</i><par n="केटी__n"/></e>
<e lm="ब्वाँसो"><i>ब्वाँस</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="चरो"><i>चर</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="सालो"><i>साल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="हलो"><i>हल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="घडी"><i>घडी</i><par n="केटी__n"/></e>
<e lm="हाँगो"><i>हाँग</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="एकाउन्टेन्ट"><i>एकाउन्टेन्ट</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="सहायक"><i>सहायक</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="बिरालो"><i>बिराल</i><par n="डोक/ो__n"/></e>
<e lm="अध्यक्ष"><i>अध्यक्ष</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="परामर्शदाता"><i>परामर्शदाता</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="फुटबल"><i>फुटबल</i><par n="घर__n"/></e>
<e lm="बुवा"><i>बुवा</i><par n="भाइ__n"/></e>
<e lm="छोरा"><i>छोरा</i><par n="भाइ__n"/></e>
<e lm="अंकल"><i>अंकल</i><par n="भाइ__n"/></e>
<e lm="भाइ"><i>भाइ</i><par n="भाइ__n"/></e>
<e lm="दाइ"><i>दाइ</i><par n="भाइ__n"/></e>
<e lm="आमा"><i>आमा</i><par n="बहिनी__n"/></e>
<e lm="छोरी"><i>छोरी</i><par n="बहिनी__n"/></e>
<e lm="अण्टी"><i>अण्टी</i><par n="बहिनी__n"/></e>
<e lm="बहिनी"><i>बहिनी</i><par n="बहिनी__n"/></e>
<e lm="दिदी"><i>दिदी</i><par n="बहिनी__n"/></e>
<e lm="राम"><i>राम</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="श्याम"><i>श्याम</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="हरि"><i>हरि</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सुनिल"><i>सुनिल</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="नबराज"><i>नबराज</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="दिपक"><i>दिपक</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सुरेन्द्र"><i>सुरेन्द्र</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="रमेश"><i>रमेश</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="दिपेश"><i>दिपेश</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सुरेश"><i>सुरेश</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="गोविन्द"><i>गोविन्द</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="अशोक"><i>अशोक</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="गोपाल"><i>गोपाल</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="हेमराज"><i>हेमराज</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="योगराज"><i>योगराज</i><par n="राम__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सीता"><i>सीता</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="गीता"><i>गीता</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="लक्ष्मी"><i>लक्ष्मी</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="तारा"><i>तारा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="माया"><i>माया</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="रेनु"><i>रेनु</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="राधा"><i>राधा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सरस्वती"><i>सरस्वती</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="रीता"><i>रीता</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="कमला"><i>कमला</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="सुभिक्षा"><i>सुभिक्षा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="ऋचा"><i>ऋचा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="शोभा"><i>शोभा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="समीक्षा"><i>समीक्षा</i><par n="सीता__pn"/></e>
<e lm="धेरै"><i>धेरै</i><par n="धेरै__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="राम्रो"><i>राम्रो</i><par n="सायद__adv"/></e>
<e lm="नराम्रो"><i>नराम्रो</i><par n="सायद__adv"/></e>
